Utah statutes.
78B-5-604.   Certificate of location or purchase of public lands of United States as evidence.

A certificate of purchase or of location of any lands in this state, issued or made in pursuance of any law of the United States, is prima facie evidence that the holder or assignee of the certificate is the owner of the land described in the certificate.  This evidence may be overcome by proof that the land was in the adverse possession of the adverse party, or those under whom the party claims, or that the adverse party was holding the land for mining purposes at the time the certificate is filed.

